Hawaii, session 2026, HB2568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the practice of vertical filming, which refers to films and videos shot in a vertical orientation, has grown in popularity in recent years.  The legislature further finds that capitalizing on the growing popularity of vertical filming could help ensure that Hawaii's film industry remains competitive and at the forefront of emerging trends.  The legislature recognizes that there is a need to increase funding available to support the film industry, particularly through the Hawaii film and creative industries development special fund.  The legislature also finds that the Hawaii film and creative industries development special fund receives funding through a fee collected from taxpayers claiming the motion picture, digital media, and film production income tax credit.  Increasing this fee amount would create additional funding, which could be used to support vertical filming in the State by supporting set building, grant distribution, training, workforce development, equipment access, and networking opportunities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Increase the fee collected from taxpayers claiming the motion picture, digital media, and film production income tax credit and require a portion of funds collected to be used to support the vertical film industry in the State; and (2)  Expand the funding sources of the Hawaii film and creative industries development special fund to include revenues received by the department of business, economic development, and tourism from managing the Hawaii film studio. SECTION 2.  Section 201-113, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established in the state treasury the Hawaii film and creative industries development special fund into which shall be deposited: (1)  Appropriations by the legislature; (2)  Donations and contributions made by private individuals or organizations for deposit into the fund; (3)  Grants provided by governmental agencies or any other source; (4)  Effective January 2, 2023, all revenues, fees, and charges from the processing of the motion picture, digital media, and film production income tax credit pursuant to section 235-17; provided that eighty per cent of the funds collected pursuant to section 235‑17(k) shall be expended to support the vertical film industry in the State; and (5)  [Effective July 1, 2022, all existing and future] All revenues, fees, and income received by the department from its management of public facilities that support media and entertainment workforce and business development, [with the exception of] including the Hawaii film studio. For the purposes of this subsection, "vertical film" means video content shot and presented in a portrait orientation with an image that is taller than it is wide, typically intended to be viewed on a smartphone screen." SECTION 3.  Section 235-17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (k) to read as follows: "(k) Each taxpayer claiming a tax credit under this section shall submit to the department of business, economic development, and tourism a fee for the motion picture, digital media, and film production income tax credit in an amount equal to [0.2] one per cent of the tax credit claimed by the qualified production no later than the deadline stated in subsection (c).  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may prescribe the form and method by which this fee is remitted, including through electronic means.  The fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the Hawaii film and creative industries development special fund under section 201-113." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026; provided that on January 1, 2033: (1)  Section 2 of this Act shall be repealed and section 201‑113, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day prior to the effective date of this Act; and (2)  Section 3 of this Act shall be repealed to coincide with the repeal date of Act 88, Session Laws of Hawaii 2006, as amended by Act 89, Session Laws of Hawaii 2013, as amended by Act 143, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017, as amended by Act 217, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, and section 235‑17, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day before the effective date of Act 88, Session Laws of Hawaii 2006.